North Carolina, session 2025, HB247.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 87-117 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-117. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(15) Nonmechanized equipment. – Hand tools.tools and soft dig technologies.
…
(20) Positive response. – An automated information system that allows excavators,
locators, operators, and other interested parties to determine the status of a
locate request.
(20a) Soft dig technologies. – An excavation method that uses air or water pressure
to break up soil and remove it with vacuum extraction.
(21) Subaqueous. – A facility that is under a body of water, including rivers,
streams, lakes, waterways, swamps, and bogs.
(22) Tolerance zone. – If the diameter of the facility is known, the horizontal
distance of one-half of the known diameter plus 24 inches on either side of the
designated center line or, if the diameter of the facility is not marked, 24 inches
on either side of the outside edge of the mark indicating a facility or, for
subaqueous facilities, a clearance of 15 feet on either side of the indicated
facility.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 87-121 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-121. Facility operator responsibilities.
(a) An operator shall provide to the excavator the following:
(1) The horizontal location and description of all of the operator's facilities in the
area where the proposed excavation or demolition is to occur. The location
shall be marked by stakes, soluble paint, flags, or any combination thereof, as
appropriate, depending upon the conditions in the area of the proposed
excavation or demolition. The operator shall, when marking as provided under
this subdivision, use the APWA Uniform Color Code. Where practical,
painted surface marks should be of adequate length to distinguish from dots.
If the diameter or width of the facility is greater than four inches, the
dimension of the facility shall be indicated at least every 50 feet in the area of
the proposed excavation or demolition. An operator who operates multiple
facilities in the area of the proposed excavation or demolition shall locate each
facility.
…
*H247-v-5*

(b) Unless otherwise provided in a written agreement between the operator and the
excavator, including an electronically transmitted written agreement, the operator shall provide
to the excavator the information required by subsection (a) of this section within the times
provided below:
(1) For a facility, within three full working days after the day notice of the
proposed excavation or demolition was provided to the Notification
Center.prior to the work start date provided by the excavator.
(2) For a subaqueous facility, within 10 full working days after the day notice of
the proposed excavation or demolition was provided to the Notification
Center.
(3) If the operator declares an extraordinary circumstance, the times provided in
this subsection shall not apply.
(4) For an emergency request, an initial contact with the excavator shall be made
within three hours.
(5) For a request of an unmarked facility required by G.S. 87-122(c)(6), the
operator shall arrange for the facility to be marked within three hours from the
time the additional notice is received by the Notification Center.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 87-122 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-122. Excavator responsibilities.
(a) Before commencing any excavation or demolition operation, the person responsible
for the excavation or demolition shall provide or cause to be provided notice to the Notification
Center of his or her intent to excavate or demolish. Notice for any excavation or demolition that
does not involve a subaqueous facility must be given within three to 12 full no less than three
full working days before the proposed commencement date of the excavation or demolition.
Notice for any excavation or demolition in the vicinity of a subaqueous facility must be given
within no less than 10 to 20 full working days before the proposed commencement date of the
excavation or demolition. Notice given pursuant to this subsection shall expire 15 full working
28 calendar days after the date notice was given. work start date. No excavation or demolition
may continue after this 15-day 28-day period unless the person responsible for the excavation or
demolition provides a subsequent notice which shall be provided in the same manner as the
original notice required by this subsection. When demolition of a building is proposed, the
operator shall be given a reasonable time in which to remove or protect the operator's facilities
before the demolition commences.
(b) The notice required by subsection (a) of this section shall, at a minimum, contain all
of the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the person providing the notice.
(2) The anticipated starting date of the proposed excavation or demolition.
(3) The anticipated duration of the proposed excavation or demolition.
(4) The type of proposed excavation or demolition operation to be conducted.
(5) The location of the proposed excavation or demolition by one of the
following:The area of locate of the proposed excavation which is limited to
an area the excavator reasonably believes may be completed within 28
calendar days from the work start date and does not include any areas
completed and accepted by the authorities having jurisdiction. The area of
locate is also limited to one of the following:
a. A single parcel that may exceed 1/4 mile in linear length identified by
a single address.
b. The lesser of five adjoining parcels identified by addresses, not to
exceed 1/4 mile in linear length or an area not to exceed 1/4 mile in
linear length.
Page 2 Session Law 2025-21 House Bill 247

(6) Whether or not explosives are to be used in the proposed excavation or
demolition.
(c) An excavator shall comply with the following:
…
(10) The excavator shall not use mechanized use nonmechanized equipment within
24 inches of a 24-inch circumference around a facility that is an oil, petroleum
products, or highly volatile liquid pipeline system, a gas transmission line, or
an electric transmission line unless the facility operator has consented to the
use in writing and the operator's representative is on site during the use of the
mechanized equipment. Within the tolerance zone of a pipeline system, the
excavator shall use safe excavation practices, including, but not limited to,
hand digging or potholing. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "oil,
petroleum products, or highly volatile liquid pipeline system" has the same
meaning as the term "pipeline system" in Title 49 C.F.R. § 195.2, the term
"gas transmission line" has the same meaning as the term "transmission line"
in Title 49 C.F.R. § 192.3, and the term "electric transmission line" has the
same meaning as the term "transmission line" in G.S. 62-100(7)."
SECTION 4. G.S. 87-124 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-124. Exemptions.
The notice requirements in G.S. 87-122(a) and G.S. 87-122(b) do not apply to the following:
(1) An excavation or demolition performed by the owner of a single-family
residential property on his or her own land that does not encroach on any
operator's right-of-way, easement, or permitted use.
(2) An excavation or demolition performed by the owner of a single-family
residential property on his or her own land that encroaches on any operator's
right-of-way, easement, or permitted use that is performed with
nonmechanized equipment.
(3) An excavation or demolition that involves the tilling of soil for agricultural or
gardening purposes.purposes that encroaches on any operator's right-of-way,
easement, or permitted use and is less than 12 inches in depth.
(4) An excavation or demolition for agricultural purposes, as defined in
G.S. 106-581.1, performed on property that does not encroach on any
operator's right-of-way, easement, or permitted use.
(5) An excavation by an operator or surveyor operator, surveyor, or their
contractor with nonmechanized equipment for the following purposes:
a. Locating for a valid notification request or for the minor repair,
connection, or routine maintenance of an existing facility or survey
pin.
b. Probing underground to determine the extent of gas or water
migration.
(6) An excavation or demolition performed when those responsible for routine
maintenance of a right-of-way or any other governmental entity are
performing, with labor on their permanent payroll, for the purpose of
maintenance activities within the right-of-way. Maintenance activities shall
include emergency replacement of signs critical for maintaining safety or
reshaping of shoulders and ditches to the original road profile. Maintenance
activities do not include the initial installation of traffic signs, traffic control
equipment, guardrails, or drainage structures. The provisions of this
subdivision do not apply when the excavation or demolition is performed by
a contractor acting on behalf of a person or entity responsible for routine
House Bill 247 Session Law 2025-21 Page 3

maintenance of a right-of-way or on behalf of any other governmental
entity.right-of-way.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 87-126 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c) The venue for claims adjudication for actual and consequential damages occurring in
North Carolina shall be held within the North Carolina court system in the county of the
occurrence."
SECTION 6. G.S. 87-128 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-128. Absence of facility location.
If an operator who has been given notice as provided in G.S. 87-120(d) by the Notification
Center fails to respond to that notice as provided in G.S. 87-121 or fails to properly locate the
facility, the person excavating is free to proceed with the excavation. Neither excavation and
neither the excavator nor the person financially responsible for the excavation will be liable to
the nonresponding or improperly responding operator for damages to the operator's facilities if
the person doing the excavating exercises due care to protect existing facilities when there is
evidence of the existence of those facilities near the proposed excavation area.so long as the
excavator has exercised due care in preparing for or conducting the excavation. For the purposes
of this section, the excavator shall be entitled to a presumption, rebuttable by clear and
convincing evidence, that it has exercised due care in preparing for or conducting the excavation
where (i) the Notification Center gives the operator the notice required in G.S. 87-120(d), (ii) the
operator fails to respond to that notice as provided in G.S. 87-121 or fails to properly locate the
facility, (iii) the excavator has complied with the requirements of G.S. 87-122(c), and (iv) the
excavator did not have actual knowledge of the existence of a facility located within the area of
the excavation to be performed."
SECTION 7. G.S. 87-129 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-129. Underground Damage Prevention Review Board; enforcement; civil penalties.
(a) There is hereby established the Underground Damage Prevention Review Board to
review reports of alleged violations of this Article. The members of the Board shall be appointed
by the Governor. The Board shall consist of 15 members as follows:
(1) A representative from the North Carolina Department of Transportation;
(2) A representative from a facility contract locator;
(3) A representative from the Notification Center;
(4) A representative from an electric public utility;
(5) A representative from the telecommunications industry;
(6) A representative from a natural gas utility;
(7) A representative from a hazardous liquid transmission pipeline company;
(8) A representative of a municipality, appointed on the recommendation of the
League of Municipalities;
(9) A highway contractor licensed under G.S. 87-10(b)(2) who does not own or
operate facilities;
(10) A public utilities contractor licensed under G.S. 87-10(b)(3) who does not
own or operate facilities;
(11) A surveyor licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes;
(12) A representative from a rural water system, appointed on the recommendation
of the North Carolina Rural Water Association;
(13) A representative from an investor-owned water system;
(14) A representative from an electric membership corporation; and
(15) A representative from a cable company, appointed on the recommendation of
the North Carolina Cable Telecommunications Association.
(a1) Each member of the Board shall be appointed for a term of four years. Members of
the Board may serve no more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies in appointments made by
Page 4 Session Law 2025-21 House Bill 247

the Governor occurring prior to the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired term. To the extent practicable, the Governor shall fill any vacancy in the Board within
60 days after the vacancy.
(a2) No member of the Board may serve on a case where there would be a conflict of
interest.
(a3) The Governor may remove any member at any time for cause.
(a4) Eight members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.A quorum is met when the
majority of seated members are present. Board members may appear at meetings by simultaneous
communication via conference telephone or other electronic means.
(a5) The Governor shall designate one member of the Board as chair.
(a6) The Board may adopt rules to implement this Article.
(a7) The Board shall establish an internal attendance policy. In the event a Board member
resigns or fails to meet the criteria of the attendance policy, the Board may appoint an interim
member to represent the same stakeholder group until such time as the Governor appoints a
replacement for the unexpired term.
(a8) On request of the Board, the Utilities Commission shall appoint a nonvoting ex officio
member as an administrative representative to provide counsel and coordinate efforts of the
Board.
(b) The Board shall receive reports of alleged violations of this Article. The Board shall
contact persons against whom reports have been filed to inform them of the alleged violation
within 10 15 working days of the filing of the report. The Board shall maintain all of the following
information regarding reports of alleged violations:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the person making the report;
(2) The nature of the report, including the statute that is alleged to have been
violated;
(3) Information provided by the person making the report, including
correspondence, both written and electronic, pictures, and videos; and
(4) Information provided by the person against whom the report has been filed,
including correspondence, both written and electronic, pictures, and videos.
(b1) The Board shall review all reports of alleged violations of this Article and
accompanying information. If the Board determines that a person has violated any provision of
this Article, the Board shall determine the appropriate action or penalty to impose for each such
violation. Actions and penalties may include training, education, and a civil penalty not to exceed
two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). The Board shall approve training courses and the
sponsors of those training courses under this subsection. Any fees for training courses approved
by the Board shall be paid by the person determined to have violated this Article. The Board shall
notify within 30 days each person who is determined to have violated this Article in writing of
the Board's determination and the Board's recommended action or penalty. A person determined
to be in violation of this Article may request a hearing before the Board, after which the Board
may reverse or uphold its original finding. If the Board recommends a penalty, the Board shall
notify the Utilities Commission of the recommended penalty, and the Utilities Commission shall
issue an order imposing the penalty.
(b2) Notwithstanding Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, a person determined to be in
violation of this Article may request an informal conference before the Board by notifying the
Board in writing within 30 days of the Board's determination. Such a person must attend the
informal conference in person. They may be represented by an attorney or other person and may
present evidence and make arguments in favor of their position. Following the informal
conference, the Board may reverse, modify, or uphold its original finding. If the Board
recommends a penalty, the Board shall notify the Utilities Commission of the recommended
penalty, and the Utilities Commission shall issue an order imposing the penalty within 30 days
of notification by the Board.
House Bill 247 Session Law 2025-21 Page 5

(c) A person determined by the Board under subsection (b1) of this section to have
violated this Article may appeal the Board's determination by initiating an arbitration proceeding
before the Utilities Commission within 30 days of the Board's determination. determination
following the informal conference. If the violating party elects to initiate an arbitration
proceeding, the violating party shall pay a filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) to the
Utilities Commission, and the Utilities Commission shall open a docket regarding the report. The
Utilities Commission shall direct the parties enter into an arbitration process. The parties shall be
responsible for selecting and contracting with the arbitrator. Upon completion of the arbitration
process, the Utilities Commission shall issue an order encompassing the outcome of the binding
arbitration process, including a determination of fault, a penalty, and assessing the costs of
arbitration to the non-prevailing party.
(c1) A person may timely appeal an order issued by the Utilities Commission pursuant to
this section to the superior court division of the General Court of Justice in the county where the
alleged violation of this Article occurred or in Wake County, for trial de novo within 30 days of
entry of the Utilities Commission's order. The authority granted to the Utilities Commission
within this section is limited to this section and does not grant the Utilities Commission any
authority that they are not otherwise granted under Chapter 62 of the General Statutes.
(d) The provisions of this Article do not affect any civil remedies for personal injury or
property damage otherwise available to any person, except as otherwise specifically provided for
in this Article. The penalty provisions of this Article are cumulative to and not in conflict with
provisions of law with respect to civil remedies for personal injury or property damage. The clear
proceeds of any civil penalty assessed under this section shall be used as provided in Section 7(a)
of Article IX of the North Carolina Constitution. In any arbitration proceeding before the Utilities
Commission, any actions and penalties assessed against any person for violation of this Article
shall include the actions and penalties set out in subsection (b1) of this section.
(d1) The Utilities Commission shall annually report to the Board compliance of persons
on whom fines or penalties have been imposed under this Article.
(d2) If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the Utilities Commission within 90 days of
the Utilities Commission issuing the order, the Attorney General, at the request of the Utilities
Commission, shall bring an action in the name of the State of North Carolina in the Superior
Court for Wake County to recover the penalty. The action shall not commence until after the time
has expired for an appeal from the findings, conclusions, and order of the Utilities Commission.
(e) The Board is authorized to employ contractors or other personnel as it may deem
necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article.
(f) The Board shall maintain a record of reports of alleged violations of this Article
received under subsection (b) of this section for at least four years, including responses to such
reports.
(g) On request of the Board, the Attorney General's office shall assign a legal
representative to provide legal counsel to the Board."
Page 6 Session Law 2025-21 House Bill 247

SECTION 8. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 19th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Timothy Reeder, MD
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 9:41 a.m. this 26th day of June, 2025
House Bill 247 Session Law 2025-21 Page 7